Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.900

Construction to secure uniformity.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it and to coordinate the interpretation and administration of this chapter with the related federal regulation.

[ 1959 c 282 s 61.]